Oklahoma, session 2025, SB143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 4-109.3, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 223, O.S.L. 2023 (26 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 4-109.3), is amended to read as follows:


Section 4-109.3. A. When a qualified elector applies for


issuance or renewal of an Oklahoma driver license, or issuance of a


state identification card issued pursuant to Section 6-105 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes, he or she shall be provided voter


registration services as required by the National Voter Registration


Act of 1993. The person shall be asked whether he or she wishes to

Req. No. 223 Page 1


register to vote or to change his or her address for voting


purposes. If the person is not currently registered to vote, he or


she shall be automatically registered unless he or she specifically


declines; provided, such person shall be registered as an


independent unless he or she affirmatively chooses a political


party. If the person is currently registered to vote, his or her


address will be updated unless he or she specifically declines such


update. A person who declines to register or to update his or her


address for voting purposes shall confirm such choice in writing or


by electronic means. Completed electronic voter registration


applications shall be electronically transmitted by the agency


accepting the application to the State Election Board or county


election board. Completed paper voter registration applications


shall be transmitted by the agency accepting the application at the


close of business each week to the State Election Board in


preaddressed, postage prepaid envelopes provided by the State


Election Board. If a person registers or declines to register to


vote, the office at which the person submits the voter registration


application or the fact that the person declined to register shall


remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration


purposes.


B. No voter registration services shall be offered to any


person who, at the time of an application for issuance or renewal of


an Oklahoma driver license or state identification card, provides

Req. No. 223 Page 2


documentation that shows that the person is not a citizen of the


United States.


C. A change of address for an Oklahoma driver license or state


identification card submitted by a registered voter shall also serve


as a change of address for voter registration purposes if the new


address is within the same county where the voter is registered to


vote. If the new address is outside the county where the voter is


currently registered to vote, the voter shall be sent a notice and


application with instructions for registering to vote at the new


address. A change of address for an Oklahoma driver license or


state identification card shall not be used to update a voter


registration address if the registrant states in writing or by


electronic means that the change of address is not for voter


registration purposes.


D. Licensed operators shall receive fifty cents ($0.50) per


valid paper voter registration application or application for change


in voter registration taken by themselves and employees of the


licensed operator’s office taken at the licensed operator’s office,


payable by the State Election Board.


E. Service Oklahoma shall notify the Secretary of the State


Election Board of licensed operator appointments. Service Oklahoma


shall notify the Secretary of the State Election Board of licensed


operators qualified to issue driver licenses.



Req. No. 223 Page 3


F. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall promulgate


rules and procedures to implement the requirements of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-223 TEK 12/30/2024 10:17:40 AM







































Req. No. 223 Page 4